test/src/morphology/N-kilg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kiļg*: # Noun 110 'eng /est külg/fin' - full paradigm
     kiļg*+N+Sg+Nom: kiļg*
     kiļg*+N+Sg+Gen: kilg
     kiļg*+N+Sg+Par: kīlta
     kiļg*+N+Sg+Dat: kilgõn
     kiļg*+N+Sg+Ins: kilgkõks
     kiļg*+N+Sg+Ill: kilgõ
     kiļg*+N+Sg+Ela: kilgstõ
     kiļg*+N+Pl+Nom: kīlgõd
     kiļg*+N+Pl+Gen: kīlgõd
     kiļg*+N+Pl+Par: kiļgi
     kiļg*+N+Pl+Dat: kīlgõdõn
     kiļg*+N+Pl+Ins: kīlgõdõks
     kiļg*+N+Pl+Ill: kīlgiž
     kiļg*+N+Pl+Ela: kiļgšti
